Mississippi statutes. Title 49. Conservation and Ecology
Mississippi Gulf Region Utility Act
§ 49-17-741.
Board of directors, officers, compensation.

The board of directors of a county authority shall elect annually from its number a president and vice president of the county authority and such other officers as in the judgment of the board are necessary. The president shall be the chief executive officer of the authority and the presiding officer of the board, and shall have the same right to vote as any other director. The vice president shall act in the absence or disability of the president. Each board also shall appoint a secretary and a treasurer who may or may not be members of the board, and it may combine these offices. The treasurer shall give bond in the sum of not less than One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) as set by the board of directors, and each director may be required to give bond in the sum of not less than Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00), with sureties qualified to do business in this state, and the premiums on the bonds shall be an expense of the authority. Each bond shall be payable to the State of Mississippi, and the condition of each bond shall be that the treasurer and director will faithfully perform all duties of his office and account for all money and other assets which shall come into his custody as treasurer or director of the authority.

Each director of a county authority shall serve without salary, but shall be entitled to receive per diem pay as provided for in Section 25-3-69 and shall be reimbursed his actual necessary expenses, as provided in Section 25-3-41, incurred while in the performance of his duties as a member of the board of directors of the authority upon authorization by the board. Expenses shall be paid from available funds of the authority.

All business of a county authority shall be transacted by a majority vote of the total membership of the board of directors. The quorum for any meeting of the board of directors shall be a majority of the total membership of the board of directors.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 546, § 21, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2006.).

§ 49-17-743.
Powers of the county authorities.

From and after April 18, 2006, each and every county authority shall have, in addition to any other powers granted under any other provision of law, including, but not limited to, the following:

To acquire, construct, improve, enlarge, extend, repair, operate and maintain one or more of its systems used for the collection, transportation, treatment and disposal of water, wastewater and storm water;

To make contracts with any person in furtherance thereof; and to make contracts with any person, under the terms of which the county authority will collect, transport, treat or dispose of water, wastewater and storm water for such person;

To make contracts with any person to design and construct any water, wastewater and storm water systems or facilities, and thereafter to purchase, lease or sell, by installments over such terms as may be deemed desirable, reasonable and necessary, or otherwise, any such system or systems;

To enter into operating agreements with any person, for such terms and upon such conditions as may be deemed desirable, for the operation of any water, wastewater and storm water systems; and the county authority may lease to or from any person, for such term and upon such conditions as may be deemed desirable, any water, wastewater and storm water collection, transportation, treatment or its other facilities or systems. Any such contract may contain provisions requiring any public agency or other person to regulate the quality and strength of materials to be handled by the respective system or systems and also may provide that the county authority shall have the right to use any streets, alleys and public ways and places within the jurisdiction of a public agency or other person during the term of the contract;

To enter into contracts with any person or any public agency, including, but not limited to, contracts authorized by this act, in furtherance of any of the purposes authorized under this act upon such consideration as the board of directors and such person may agree. Any such contract may extend over any period of time, notwithstanding any provision or rule of law to the contrary; may be upon such terms and for such consideration, nominal or otherwise, as the parties thereto shall agree; and may provide that it shall continue in effect until bonds specified therein, refunding bonds issued in lieu of such bonds, and all other obligations specified therein are paid or terminated. Any such contract shall be binding upon the parties thereto according to its terms;

To adopt an official seal and alter the same at pleasure;

To sue and be sued, in its own name, and to enjoy all of the protections, immunities and benefits provided by the Mississippi Tort Claims Act, as it may be amended or supplemented from time to time;

To maintain office space at such place or places within the county authority boundaries as it may determine;

To invest money of the county authority, including proceeds from the sale of any bonds subject to any agreements with bondholders, on such terms and in such manner as the county authority deems proper;

To require the necessary relocation or rerouting of roads and highways, railroad, telephone and telegraph lines, and properties, electric power lines, gas pipelines and related facilities, or to require the anchoring or other protection of any of these, provided fair compensation is first paid to the owners or an agreement with such owners regarding the payment of the cost of such relocation, and to acquire easements or rights-of-way for such relocation or rerouting and to convey the same to the owners of the property being relocated or rerouted in connection with the purposes of this act;

To acquire, construct, improve or modify, to operate or cause to be operated and maintained, either as owner of all or of any part in common with others, any water, wastewater or storm water system within the county authority’s service area. The county authority may pay all or part of the cost of any system from any contribution by persons, firms, public agencies or corporations. The county authority may receive, accept and use all funds, public or private, and pay all costs of the development, implementation and maintenance as may be determined as necessary for any project;

To acquire, in its own name, by purchase on any terms and conditions and in any manner as it may deem proper, including by eminent domain, property for public use, or by gift, grant, lease, or otherwise, real property or easements therein, franchises and personal property necessary or convenient for its corporate purposes;

To acquire insurance for the county authority’s systems, facilities, buildings, treatment plants and all property, real or personal, to insure against all risks as any insurance may, from time to time, be available;

To use any property and rent or lease any property to or from others, including public agencies, or make contracts for the use of the property. The county authority may sell, lease, exchange, transfer, assign, pledge, mortgage or grant a security interest for any property. The powers to acquire, use and dispose of property as set forth in this paragraph shall include the power to acquire, use and dispose of any interest in that property, whether divided or undivided. Title to any property of the county authority shall be held by the county authority exclusively for the benefit of the public;

To apply, contract for, accept, receive and administer gifts, grants, appropriations and donations of money, materials and property of any kind, including loans and grants from the United States, the state, a unit of local government, or any agency, department, district or instrumentality of any of the foregoing, upon any terms and conditions as the United States, the state, a unit of local government, or any agency, department, district or instrumentality shall impose. The county authority may administer trusts. The county authority may sell, lease, transfer, convey, appropriate and pledge any and all of its property and assets;

To make and enforce, and from time to time amend and repeal, bylaws, rules, ordinances and regulations for the management of its business and affairs and for the construction, use, maintenance and operation of any of the systems under its management and control;

To employ and terminate staff and other personnel, including attorneys, engineers and consultants as may be necessary to the functioning of the county authority. The board of directors, in its discretion, may employ an executive director having the authority to employ and fire employees and other duties as determined by the board;

To establish and maintain rates, fees and any other charges for services and the use of systems and facilities within the control of the county authority, and from time to time, to adjust such rates, fees and any other charges to the end that the revenues therefrom will be sufficient at all times to pay the expenses of operating and maintaining of the facilities and treatment systems and all of the persons’ obligations under any contract or bonds resolution with respect thereto or any obligation of any person under any agreement, contract, indenture or bonds resolution with respect thereto. Such rates, fees, assessments and any other charges shall not be subject to the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Public Service Commission;

To adopt rules and regulations necessary to accomplish the purposes of the county authority and to assure the payment of each participating person or public agency of its proportionate share of the costs for use of any of the systems and facilities of the county authority and for the county authority’s proportionate share of the costs of the utility board;

To enter on public or private lands, waters or premises for the purpose of making surveys, borings or soundings, or conducting tests, examinations or inspections for the purposes of the authority, subject to responsibility for any damage done to property entered;

To accept industrial wastewater from within the boundaries of the county authority for treatment and to require the pretreatment of same when, in the opinion of the county authority, such pretreatment is necessary;

To control and operate local retail water, wastewater and storm water services, and may provide or be responsible for direct servicing of those services to residences, businesses and individuals; however, the county authority shall not provide the same services in an area provided by a public utility or person holding a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued by the Mississippi Public Service Commission for the provision of such services in the certificated area. Any rates, fees, assessments or other charges shall not be under the control or regulation of the Mississippi Public Service Commission;

To assume control and administer, within the county authority’s jurisdiction, any water, wastewater or storm water system or systems by agreement or contract with any person if the person providing such services requests to be relieved of that responsibility. However, the person may maintain control over connections in their service areas and may charge rates, fees and any other charges in addition to the rates, fees and any charges of the county authority;

The county authority shall have the power of eminent domain for the particular purpose of the acquisition of property designated by plan to sufficiently accommodate the location of water, wastewater or storm water systems and such requirements related directly thereto pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 27, Title 11, Mississippi Code of 1972. The county authority may acquire by eminent domain property necessary for any system and the exercise of the powers, rights and duties conferred upon the county authority by this act. No person owning the drilling rights or the right to share in production shall be prevented from exploring, developing or producing oil or gas with necessary rights-of-way for ingress and egress, pipelines and other means of transporting such interests on any lands or interest of the county authority held or used for the purposes of this act, but any such activities shall be subject to reasonable regulations by the board of directors that will adequately protect the systems or projects of the county authority;

To use any legally available funds to acquire, rebuild, operate and maintain any existing water, wastewater or storm water systems owned or operated by any person;

To refuse to receive water, wastewater or storm water from any public agency or person; and

So long as any indebtedness on the systems of the county authority remains outstanding, to require by contract with a member public agency, or other person, that all water, wastewater and storm water within the boundaries of the respective county authority be disposed of through the appropriate treatment system to the extent that the same may be available, but no public agency shall be precluded from constructing, operating and maintaining its own such system after the current indebtedness owing on the system as of April 18, 2006, is paid in full.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 546, § 22, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2006.).

§ 49-17-745.
Promulgation of rules and regulations relating to construction, operation and maintenance of any water, wastewater and storm water systems within each county authority’s service area.

The county authority shall have the power, duty and responsibility to exercise general supervision over the design, construction, operation and maintenance of water, wastewater and storm water systems.

The county authority shall adopt rules and regulations regarding the design, construction or installation, operation and maintenance of water, wastewater and storm water systems.

The county authority shall adopt rules and regulations regarding the use of decentralized treatment systems, individual on-site wastewater treatment systems and centralized wastewater treatment systems.

The county authority shall adopt rules establishing performance standards for water, wastewater and storm water systems and the operation and maintenance of the same. Such rules and regulations shall include the implementation of a standard application form for the installation, operation and maintenance of such systems; application review; approval or denial procedures for any proposed system; inspection, monitoring and reporting guidelines; and enforcement procedures.

Before a building or development which requires the installation of a water, wastewater or storm water system is constructed, the system must be submitted to the county authority for certification that the system complies with the county authority requirements for such system.

Before approving or renewing a water, wastewater or storm water related permit for a system within a county authority, the state agency must require certification that the system complies with the requirements of the county authority.

Any system of any municipality, public agency or other persons which contracts with a county authority, shall be subject to the terms of that contract and the terms of this act.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 51-39-1 et seq., the county authority shall have the full power to adopt rules and regulations and to construct, maintain and operate facilities for the control of storm water quality and quantity. In addition, the provisions of Section 51-33-1 et seq. relating to drainage districts and flood control districts do not apply to the county authority.

The county authority may control and operate the local retail water, wastewater or storm water services and may provide or be responsible for direct servicing of those services to residences, businesses and individuals; however, the county authority shall not provide the same service in an area provided by a public utility or person holding a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued by the Mississippi Public Service Commission for the provision of such services in the certificated area.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 546, § 23; Laws, 2009, ch. 494, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 49-17-747.
Contracts between public agencies or persons and the county authority for provision of water, wastewater and storm water services by the county authority; payment for services and contributions by public agencies.

Any public agency or person, pursuant to a duly adopted resolution of the governing body of such public agency or person, may enter into contracts with the county authority or county authorities under the terms of which the county authority will manage, operate and contract for usage of its systems and facilities, or other services, for such person or public agency.

Any public agency or person may enter into contracts with the county authority for the county authority to purchase or sell, by installments over such terms as may be deemed desirable, or otherwise, to any person or any systems. Any public agency may sell, donate, convey, or otherwise dispose of water, wastewater and storm water facilities or systems; or any equipment, personal property or any other things, deemed necessary for the construction, operation, and maintenance to the county authority without the necessity of appraisal, advertising, or bidding. This section creates an alternative method of disposal of public property.

Any public agency is authorized to enter into operating agreements with the county authority, for such terms and upon such conditions as may be deemed desirable, for the operation of any of its systems of any person by the county authority or by any person contracting with the county authority to operate such systems.

Any public agency may lease to or from the county authority, for such term and upon such conditions as may be deemed desirable, any of its systems.

Any municipality or county may donate office space, equipment, supplies, and materials to the authority.

Any such contract may contain provisions requiring any public agency or other person to regulate the quality and strength of the material to be handled by the wastewater or storm water systems and may also provide that the county authority shall have the right to use any streets, alleys and public ways and places within the jurisdiction of a public agency or other person during the term of the contract. Such contracts may obligate the public agency to make payments to the county authority or to a trustee in amounts which shall be sufficient to enable the county authority to defray the expenses of administering, operating and maintaining its respective systems, to pay interest and principal (whether at maturity upon redemption or otherwise) on bonds of the county authority, issued under this act and to fund reserves for debt service, for operation and maintenance and for renewals and replacements, to fulfill the requirements of any rate covenant with respect to debt service coverage contained in any resolution, trust indenture or other security agreement relating to the bonds of the county authority issued under this act or to fulfill any other requirement relating to bonds issued pursuant to this act.

Any public agency shall have the power to enter into such contracts with the county authority as in the discretion of the governing body of the public agency would be in the best interest of the public agency.Such contracts may include a pledge of the full faith and credit of such public agency and/or the avails of any special assessments made by such public agency against property receiving benefits, as now or hereafter are provided by law.Any such contract may provide for the sale, or lease to, or use of by the county authority, of the systems or any part thereof, of the public agency; and may provide that the county authority shall operate its systems or any part thereof of the public agency; and may provide that any public agency shall have the right to continued use and/or priority use of the systems or any part thereof during the useful life thereof upon payment of reasonable charges therefor; and may contain provisions to assure equitable treatment of persons or public agencies who contract with the county authority under this act; and may contain such other provisions and requirements as the parties thereto may determine to be appropriate or necessary.Such contracts may extend over any period of time, notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, and may extend beyond the life of the respective systems or any part thereof or the term of the bonds sold with respect to such facilities or improvements thereto.

The obligations of a public agency arising under the terms of any contract referred to in this act, whether or not payable solely from a pledge of revenues, shall not be included within the indebtedness limitations of the public agency for purposes of any constitutional or statutory limitation or provision. To the extent provided in such contract and to the extent such obligations of the public agency are payable wholly or in part from the revenues and other monies derived by the public agency from the operation of its systems or of its combined systems, or any part thereof, such obligations shall be treated as expenses of operating such systems.

Contracts referred to in this section may also provide for payments in the form of contributions to defray the cost of any purpose set forth in the contracts and as advances for the respective systems or any part thereof subject to repayment by the county authority. A public agency may make such contributions or advances from its general fund or surplus fund or from special assessments or from any monies legally available therefor.

Payments made, or to be made, to the county authority by a public agency or other person under a contract for any of its treatment systems, or any part thereof, shall not be subject to approval or review by the Mississippi Public Service Commission.

Subject to the terms of a contract or contracts referred to in this act, the county authority is hereby authorized to do and perform any and all acts or things necessary, convenient or desirable to carry out the purposes of such contracts, including the fixing, charging, collecting, maintaining and revising of rates, fees and other charges for the services rendered to any user of any of the systems operated or maintained by the county authority, whether or not such systems are owned by the county authority.

No provision of this act shall be construed to prohibit any public agency, otherwise permitted by law to issue bonds, from issuing bonds in the manner provided by law for the construction, renovation, repair or development of any of the county authority’s systems, or any part thereof, owned or operated by such public agency.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 546, § 24, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2006.).

§ 49-17-749.
Rates, fees and other charges by public agencies for services provided by county authority.

Whenever a public agency shall have executed a contract under this act and the payments thereunder are to be made either wholly or partly from the revenues of the public agency’s systems, or any part thereof, or a combination of such systems, the duty is hereby imposed on the public agency to establish and maintain and from time to time to adjust the rate or fees charged by the public agency for the services of such systems, so that the revenues therefrom, together with any taxes and special assessments levied in support thereof, will be sufficient at all times to pay:

The expense of operating and maintaining such systems, including all of the public agency’s obligations to the county authority, its successors or assigns under such contract; and

All of the public agency’s obligations under and in connection with bonds theretofore issued, or which may be issued thereafter and secured by the revenues of such systems. Any such contract may require the use of consulting engineers and financial experts to advise the public agency whether and when such rates and fees are to be adjusted.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 546, § 25, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2006.).

§ 49-17-751.
Public Service Commission notice.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 77-3-21 and 77-3-23, Mississippi Code of 1972, the certificate of public convenience and necessity held by any municipality, public agency, district, public utility or other person authorized by law to provide water, sewer and wastewater services may be cancelled and its powers, duties and responsibilities transferred to the county authority in the manner provided by this section.

Any entity described in subsection (1) of this section desiring to have its certificate of public convenience and necessity cancelled and its powers, duties and responsibilities transferred to the county authority shall make a determination to that effect on its official minutes if a public entity, or by affidavit if not a public entity, and transmit such determination to the county authority.

Upon receipt of the document evidencing such determination from an entity to transfer its powers, duties and responsibilities to the county authority, the county authority shall, by resolution, declare whether it is willing and able to accept such transfer from the entity.

Upon completion of the requirements of subsections (2) and (3) herein and agreement by both parties to the transfer, the holder of the certificate of public convenience and necessity and the county authority shall jointly petition the Public Service Commission to cancel the certificate of public convenience and necessity. The petition must be accompanied by copies of the official minutes, affidavit or resolution, as the case may be, reflecting the actions of the petitioners. After review of the petition and any other evidence as the Public Service Commission deems necessary, the commission may issue an order canceling the certificate and transferring to the county authority the powers, duties and responsibilities granted by the certificate, including all assets and debts of the transferor petitioner related to such certificated services, real or personal, or both, if it finds that:

Subsections (2) and (3) of this section have been complied with; and

Such action is in the public interest.

The county authority and providers of water, sewer, wastewater and storm water services that are not holders of a certificate of a public convenience and necessity from the Public Service Commission may enter into agreements for the provision of such services, including, but not limited to, the transfer to the county authority of such provider’s powers, duties, responsibilities, assets and debts.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 546, § 26, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2006.).

§ 49-17-753.
Validation of prior indebtedness.

Any system of a municipality, public agency or person that becomes subject to the jurisdiction of a county authority and this act shall not impair, invalidate or abrogate any liens, bonds or other certificates of indebtedness related to water, storm water or wastewater facilities and systems incurred prior to becoming subject to the jurisdiction of the county authority.

The county authority may do and perform any and all acts necessary, convenient or desirable to ensure the payment, redemption or satisfaction of such liens, bonds or other certificates of indebtedness.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 546, § 27, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2006.).

§ 49-17-755.
The power to borrow money and to issue revenue bonds.

Sections 49-17-753 through 49-17-771 apply to all bonds to be issued after April 18, 2006, and such provisions shall not affect, limit or alter the rights and powers of any county authority under this act or any law of Mississippi to conduct the activities referred to herein in any way pertinent to the interests of the bondholders, including, without limitation, such county authority’s right to charge and collect rates, fees and charges and to fulfill the terms of any covenants made with the registered owners of any existing bonds, or in any other way impair the rights and remedies of the registered owners of any existing bonds, unless provision for full payment of such bonds, by escrow or otherwise, has been made pursuant to the terms of the bonds or the resolution, trust indenture or security interest securing the bonds.

The county authority shall have the power and is hereby authorized, from time to time, to borrow money and to issue revenue bonds and interim notes in such principal amounts as the county authority may determine to be necessary to provide sufficient funds for achieving one or more of the purposes of this act, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, to defray all the costs of the project, the cost of the acquisition, construction, improvement, repair or extension of a system, or any part thereof, whether or not such facilities are owned by the county authority, the payment of interest on bonds of the county authority issued pursuant to this act, establishment of reserves to secure such bonds and payment of the interest thereon, expenses incident to the issuance of such bonds and to the implementation of the county authority’s system, and all other expenditures of the county authority incident to or necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes of this act.

Before issuing bonds, other than interim notes or refunding bonds as provided in Section 49-17-757, the board of directors of the county authority shall adopt a resolution declaring its intention to issue such bonds and stating the maximum principal amount of bonds proposed to be issued, a general generic description of the proposed improvements and the proposed location thereof and the date, time and place at which the board of directors proposes to take further action with respect to the issuance of such bonds. The resolution of the county authority shall be published once a week for at least three (3) consecutive weeks in at least one (1) newspaper having a general circulation within the geographical limits of all of the public agencies which have contracted with the county authority pursuant to this act.

Bonds of the county authority issued pursuant to this act shall be payable from and secured by a pledge of all or any part of the revenues under one or more contracts entered into pursuant to this act between the county authority and one or more of its contracting public agencies and from all or any part of the revenues derived from the operation of any designated system or any part or parts thereof and any other monies legally available and designated therefor, as may be determined by such county authority, subject only to any agreement with the purchasers of the bonds. Such bonds may be further secured by a trust indenture between such county authority and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having powers of a trust company without or within the state.

Bonds of the county authority issued pursuant to this act shall be authorized by a resolution or resolutions adopted by a majority affirmative vote of the total membership of the board of directors of the county authority. Such bonds may be issued in series, and each series of such bonds shall bear such date or dates, mature at such time or times, bear interest at such rate or rates (not exceeding the maximum rate set out in Section 75-17-103, Mississippi Code of 1972), be in such denomination or denominations, be in such form, carry such conversion privileges, have such rank or priority, be executed in such manner and by such officers, be payable from such sources in such medium of payment at such place or places within or without the state, provided that one such place shall be within the state, and be subject to such terms of redemption prior to maturity, all as may be provided by resolution or resolutions of the board of directors. The term of such bonds issued pursuant to this act shall not exceed forty (40) years.

Bonds of the county authority issued pursuant to this act may be sold at such price or prices, at public or private sale, in such manner and at such times as may be determined by such county authority to be in the public interest, and such county authority may pay all expenses, premiums, fees and commissions which it may deem necessary and advantageous in connection with the issuance and sale thereof.

Any pledge of earnings, revenues or other monies made by the county authority shall be valid and binding from the time the pledge is made. The earnings, revenues or other monies so pledged and thereafter received by such county authority shall immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act, and the lien of any such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract or otherwise against such county authority irrespective of whether such parties have notice thereof. Neither the resolution nor any other instrument by which a pledge is created need be recorded.

Neither the members of the board of directors nor any person executing the bonds shall be personally liable on the bonds or be subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of the issuance thereof.

Proceeds from the sale of bonds of the county authority may be invested, pending their use, in such securities as may be specified in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or the trust indenture securing them, and the earnings on such investments applied as provided in such resolution or trust indenture.

Whenever any bonds shall have been signed by the officer(s) designated by the resolution of the board of directors to sign the bonds who were in office at the time of such signing but who may have ceased to be such officer(s) prior to the sale and delivery of such bonds, or who may not have been in office on the date such bonds may bear, the manual or facsimile signatures of such officer(s) upon such bonds shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes and have the same effect as if the person so officially executing such bonds had remained in office until the delivery of the same to the purchaser or had been in office on the date such bonds may bear.

The county authority has the discretion to advance or borrow funds needed to satisfy any short-term cash flow demands or deficiencies or to cover start-up costs until such time as sufficient bonds, assets and revenues have been secured to satisfy the needs of the county authority.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 546, § 28, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2006.).

§ 49-17-757.
Bonds of county authority.

Refunding bonds.— The county authority may, by resolution adopted by its board of directors, issue refunding bonds for the purpose of paying any of its bonds at or prior to maturity or upon acceleration or redemption. Refunding bonds may be issued at such time prior to the maturity or redemption of the refunded bonds as the board of directors deems to be in the public interest, without an election on the question of the issuance thereof. The refunding bonds may be issued in sufficient amounts to pay or provide the principal of the bonds being refunded, together with any redemption premium thereon, any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of payment of such bonds, the expenses of issue of the refunding bonds, the expenses of redeeming the bonds being refunded, and such reserves for debt service or other capital or current expenses from the proceeds of such refunding bonds as may be required by the resolution, trust indenture or other security instruments. The issue of refunding bonds, the maturities and other details thereof, the security therefor, the rights of the holders and the rights, duties and obligations of the county authority in respect of the same shall be governed by the provisions of this act relating to the issue of bonds other than refunding bonds insofar as the same may be applicable. Any such refunding may be effected, whether the obligations to be refunded shall have then matured or shall thereafter mature, either by the exchange of the refunding bonds for the obligations to be refunded thereby with the consent of the holders of the obligations so to be refunded, or by sale of the refunding bonds and the application of the proceeds thereof to the payment of the obligations proposed to be refunded thereby, and regardless of whether the obligations proposed to be refunded shall be payable on the same date or different dates or shall be due serially or otherwise.

Interim notes.— Borrowing by the county authority may be made by the delivery of interim notes to any person or public agency or financial institution by a majority vote of the board of directors.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 546, § 29, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2006.).

§ 49-17-759.
Validation of bonds.

All bonds (other than refunding bonds, interim notes and certificates of indebtedness, which may be validated) issued pursuant to this act shall be validated as now provided by law in Sections 31-13-1 through 31-13-11, Mississippi Code of 1972; however, notice of such validation proceedings shall be addressed to the citizens of the respective public agencies (a) which have contracted with the county authority pursuant to this act, and (b) whose contracts and the payments to be made by the public agencies thereunder constitute security for the bonds of such county authority proposed to be issued, and that such notice shall be published at least once in a newspaper or newspapers having a general circulation within the geographical boundaries of each of the contracting public agencies to whose citizens the notice is addressed. Such validation proceedings shall be instituted in any chancery courts within the boundaries of the county authority. The validity of the bonds so validated and of the contracts and payments to be made by the public agencies thereunder constituting security for the bonds shall be forever conclusive against the county authority and the public agencies which are parties to said contracts; and the validity of said bonds and said contracts and the payments to be made thereunder shall never be called in question in any court in this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 546, § 30, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2006.).

§ 49-17-761.
Payment of bonds.

Bonds issued under the provisions of this act shall not be deemed to constitute, within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory limitation, an indebtedness of the county authority. Such bonds shall be payable solely from the revenues or assets of the county authority pledged therefor. Each bond issued under this act shall contain on the face thereof a statement to the effect that such county authority shall not be obligated to pay the same nor the interest thereon except from the revenues or assets pledged therefor.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 546, § 31, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2006.).